Montana, session 2025, LC0253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-1-702, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-1-702. Duties. The court administrator is the administrative officer of the court. Under the direction
of the supreme court, the court administrator shall:
(1) prepare and present judicial budget requests to the legislature, including the costs of the state-
funded district court program;
(2) collect, compile, and report statistical and other data relating to the business transacted by the
courts and provide the information to the legislature on request and, if requested, in accordance with 5-11-210;
(3) to the extent possible, provide that current and future information technology applications are
coordinated and compatible with the standards and goals of the executive branch as expressed in the state
strategic information technology plan provided for in 2-17-521;
(4) recommend to the supreme court improvements in the judiciary;
(5) administer legal assistance for indigent victims of domestic violence, as provided in 3-2-714;
(6) administer state funding for district courts, as provided in chapter 5, part 9;
(7) administer the pretrial program provided for in 3-1-708;
(8) administer the treatment court support account provided for in 46-1-1115; and
(9) administer the judicial branch personnel plan; and
(10) develop, implement, and manage a single, consistent, streamlined, and centralized process for
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0253.1
employees of executive branch agencies to request and receive statewide access to the judicial branch's case
management system."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****